Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-402.04
Joint performance of common function or service; vote required; when effective.

(1) If the consolidation agreement provides for the joint performance of any common function or service, the county board of each county may submit the consolidation agreement for approval by the registered voters at the next general election or a special election pursuant to sections 22-404 and 22-405.

(2) If a consolidation agreement is adopted by resolution for the joint performance of any common function or service, the agreement becomes effective on the date specified in the agreement.

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 15;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 24.